tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "-{j}ArA{G}":
    ol<v><iv><gna_pres> : olaraq
    çek<v><tv><gna_pres> : çekerek
    iste<v><tv><gna_pres> : isteyerek
    aqla<v><iv><gna_pres> : aqlayaraq
